Illinois, session 104th, HB5207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.80 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.80)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.80)7    Sec. 2-3.80. (a) The General Assembly recognizes that 8agriculture is the most basic and singularly important 9industry in the State, that agriculture is of central 10importance to the welfare and economic stability of the State, 11and that the maintenance of this vital industry requires a 12continued source of trained and qualified individuals for 13employment in agriculture and agribusiness. The General 14Assembly hereby declares that it is in the best interests of 15the people of the State of Illinois that a comprehensive 16education program in agriculture be created and maintained by 17the State's public school system in order to ensure an 18adequate supply of trained and skilled individuals and to 19ensure appropriate representation of racial and ethnic groups 20in all phases of the industry. It is the intent of the General 21Assembly that a State program for agricultural education shall 22be a part of the curriculum of the public school system K 23through adult, and made readily available to all school   HB5207 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18467 LNS 31909 b1districts which may, at their option, include programs in 2education in agriculture as a part of the curriculum of that 3district.4    (b) The State Board of Education shall adopt such rules 5and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions 6of this Section. The rules and regulations shall not create 7any new State mandates on school districts as a condition of 8receiving federal, State, and local funds by those entities. 9It is in the intent of the General Assembly that, although this 10Section does not create any new mandates, school districts are 11strongly advised to follow the guidelines set forth in this 12Section.13    (c) The State Superintendent of Education shall assume 14responsibility for the administration of the State program 15adopted under this Section throughout the public school system 16as well as the articulation of the State program to the 17requirements and mandates of federally assisted education. 18There is currently within the State Board of Education an 19agricultural education unit to assist school districts in the 20establishment and maintenance of educational programs pursuant 21to the provisions of this Section. The staffing of the unit 22shall at all times be comprised of an appropriate number of 23full-time employees who shall serve as program consultants in 24agricultural education and shall be available to provide 25assistance to school districts. At least one consultant shall 26be responsible for the coordination of the State program, as   HB5207 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18467 LNS 31909 b1Head Consultant. At least one consultant shall be responsible 2for the coordination of the activities of student and 3agricultural organizations and associations.4    (d) A committee of 13 agriculturalists representative of 5the various and diverse areas of the agricultural industry in 6Illinois shall be established to at least develop a curriculum 7and overview the implementation of the Build Illinois through 8Quality Agricultural Education plans of the Illinois 9Leadership Council for Agricultural Education and to advise 10the State Board of Education on vocational agricultural 11education, including the administration of the agricultural 12education line item appropriation and agency rulemaking that 13affects agricultural education educators. The committee shall 14be composed of the following: 15        (1) 3 agriculturalists representing the Illinois 16    Leadership Council for Agricultural Education;17        (2) 3 agriculturalists;18        (3) 2 secondary agriculture teachers; 19        (4) one representative of "Ag In The Classroom"; 20        (5) one community college agriculture teacher; 21        (6) one adult agriculture educator; 22        (7) one university agriculture teacher educator; and 23        (8) one FFA representative. 24    All members of the committee shall be appointed by the 25Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. The 26terms of all members so appointed shall be for 3 years, except   HB5207 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18467 LNS 31909 b1that of the members initially appointed, 5 shall be appointed 2to serve for terms of one year, 4 shall be appointed to serve 3for terms of 2 years, and 4 shall be appointed to serve for 4terms of 3 years. All members of the committee shall serve 5until their successors are appointed and qualified. Subject to 6a requirement that committee members in office before January 71, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-463) may serve 8the full term to which they were appointed, the appointment of 9committee members to terms that commence on or after January 101, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-463) shall be 11made in a manner that gives effect at the earliest possible 12time to the changes that are required by Public Act 102-463 in 13the representative composition of the committee's membership.14    Vacancies in terms shall be filled by appointment of the 15Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate for the 16extent of the unexpired term. 17    The State Board of Education shall implement a Build 18Illinois through Quality Agricultural Education plan following 19receipt of these recommendations, which shall be made 20available on or before March 31, 1987. Recommendations shall 21include, but not be limited to, the development of a 22curriculum and a strategy for the purpose of establishing a 23source of trained and qualified individuals in agriculture, a 24strategy for articulating the State program in agricultural 25education throughout the public school system, and a consumer 26education outreach strategy regarding the importance of   HB5207 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18467 LNS 31909 b1agriculture in Illinois. 2    The committee of agriculturalists shall serve without 3compensation.4    (e) A school district that offers a secondary agricultural 5education program that is approved for State and federal 6funding must ensure that, at a minimum, all of the following 7are available to its secondary agricultural education 8students:9        (1) An instructional sequence of courses approved by 10    the State Board of Education.11        (2) A State and nationally affiliated FFA (Future 12    Farmers of America) chapter that is integral to 13    instruction and is not treated solely as an 14    extracurricular activity.15        (3) A mechanism for ensuring the involvement of all 16    secondary agricultural education students in formal, 17    supervised, agricultural-experience activities and 18    programs. 19    (f) Nothing in this Section may prevent those secondary 20agricultural education programs that are in operation before 21January 1, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 94-855) and 22that do not have an active State and nationally affiliated FFA 23chapter from continuing to operate or from continuing to 24receive funding from the State Board of Education. 25    (g) The State Board of Education shall, on or before March 261, 2027, submit a report to the General Assembly regarding the   HB5207 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18467 LNS 31909 b1status and availability of agricultural education programs in 2this State. The report may include statewide trends, a listing 3of challenges or barriers to agricultural education programs, 4a listing of opportunities related to agricultural education, 5and recommendations on alignment of agricultural education 6programs with workforce and postsecondary opportunities in 7agriculture and agribusiness. 8(Source: P.A. 102-463, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.